Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 279C.300 to
279C.470.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Community benefit  project” means a public improvement project that is subject to
the terms and conditions of a community benefit contract.
(2) As used in this section and in ORS 279C.375  and 279C.430, “community benefit con-
tract”  means  a public improvement contract that includes, but is not limited to, the ele-
ments described in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3)(a) A contracting  agency or local contract review board may enact or adopt, as ap-
propriate, an  ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation or other legislative or administrative
measure that authorizes the contracting agency  or local contract review board to designate
a public improvement contract as a community benefit contract.
(b) In addition to and not in lieu of any other requirement that applies to a public  im-
provement contract  under this chapter, a public improvement contract that a contracting
agency or local contract review board designates as a community benefit contract may  in-
clude as material provisions of the contract, but need  not be limited to, terms and conditions
that require the contractor to:
(A) Qualify as a training agent, as defined in ORS  660.010, or provide apprenticeship
training that meets applicable federal and state standards for apprenticeship training;
(B) Employ apprentices to perform a specified percentage of work  hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform on the community benefit project;
(C) Provide employer-paid family health insurance; and
(D) Meet any other  requirements that the contracting agency or local contract review
board sets forth in the ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation or other legislative or  admin-
istrative measure that authorizes procurements of community benefit contracts.
(c) A contracting agency or local contract review board shall:
(A) Ensure, before advertising or soliciting a  community benefit contract, that all ad-
vertisements and solicitation documents state clearly that the procurement is  for a com-
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 1
munity benefit contract and identify conspicuously all of the provisions to which a contractor
will be subject, including the percentage of work hours for which the contractor must employ
apprentices and the standards that will apply to the  health plan the contractor must provide;
and
(B) Require, before accepting and evaluating bids or proposals for a community benefit
contract, that each  bidder or proposer include with the bid or proposal a signed statement
that acknowledges that the bidder or  proposer understands and agrees to be bound by the
requirements that apply to the community benefit contract.
(4) Except as  otherwise provided in this section, a solicitation and award of a community
benefit contract is subject to all applicable provisions of the Public Contracting Code.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 279C.375 is amended to read:
279C.375. (1) After a contracting agency has opened bids and determined that the contracting
agency will award a public  improvement contract, the contracting agency shall award the contract
to the lowest responsible bidder.
(2) At least seven days before awarding a public improvement contract, unless the  contracting
agency determines that seven days is impractical under rules adopted  under ORS 279A.065, the
contracting agency shall issue to each bidder or post, electronically or otherwise, a notice of  the
contracting agency’s intent to award a contract. This subsection does not apply to  a contract to
which competitive bidding does  not apply under ORS 279C.335 (1)(c) or (d). The notice and the
manner in which the notice is posted or issued must conform  to rules adopted under ORS 279A.065.
(3) In determining the lowest responsible bidder, a contracting agency shall do  all of the fol-
lowing:
(a) Check the list created by the Construction Contractors Board under ORS 701.227 for  bidders
who are not qualified to hold a public improvement contract.
(b) Determine  whether the bidder is responsible. A responsible bidder must demonstrate to the
contracting agency that the bidder:
(A) Has available the appropriate financial, material, equipment, facility and personnel resources
and expertise, or has the ability to obtain the resources and expertise,  necessary to meet all con-
tractual  responsibilities.
(B) Holds current  licenses that businesses or service professionals operating in this state must
hold in order to undertake or perform the work specified in the contract.
(C) Is covered by liability insurance and other insurance in  amounts the contracting agency
requires in the solicitation documents.
(D) Qualifies as a carrier-insured employer or  a self-insured employer under ORS 656.407 or has
elected coverage under ORS 656.128.
(E) Has made the disclosure required under ORS 279C.370.
(F) Completed previous contracts of a similar nature with a satisfactory record of performance.
For purposes of this subparagraph, a satisfactory record of performance means that to  the extent
that the costs  associated with and time available to perform a previous contract remained within
the bidder’s control, the bidder stayed within the time and budget allotted for the procurement and
otherwise performed the contract in a satisfactory  manner. The contracting agency shall document
the bidder’s record of performance if the contracting agency finds  under this subparagraph that the
bidder is not responsible.
(G) Has a satisfactory record of integrity. The  contracting agency in evaluating the bidder’s
record of integrity may consider, among other  things, whether the bidder has previous criminal
convictions for offenses  related to obtaining or attempting to obtain a contract or subcontract or
in connection with the bidder’s  performance of a contract or subcontract. The contracting agency
shall document the bidder’s record of integrity if  the contracting agency finds under this subpara-
graph that the bidder is not responsible.
(H) Is legally qualified to contract with the contracting agency.
(I) Possesses  an unexpired certificate that the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
issued under  ORS 279A.167, if the bidder employs 50 or more full-time workers and submitted a bid
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 2
for a procurement with  an estimated contract price that exceeds $500,000 in response to an adver-
tisement or solicitation from a state contracting agency.
(J) Has agreed in the  bid or proposal to be bound by the terms and conditions of a com-
munity benefit contract,  if the public improvement contract is a community benefit contract.
[(J)] (K)  Supplied  all necessary information in connection with the inquiry concerning respon-
sibility. If  a bidder fails to promptly supply information concerning responsibility that the contract-
ing agency requests, the contracting agency shall determine the bidder’s responsibility  based on
available information, or may find that the bidder is not responsible.
(c) Document the contracting agency’s compliance  with the requirements of paragraphs (a) and
(b) of this subsection in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
RESPONSIBILITY DETERMINATION FORM
Project Name: 
Bid Number: 
Business Entity Name: 
CCB License Number: 
Form Submitted By (Contracting Agency):
Form Submitted By (Contracting Agency Representative’s Name): 
Title: 
Date: 
(The contracting agency must submit this form with attachments, if any, to  the Construction
Contractors Board within 30 days after the date of contract award.)
The contracting agency has (check all of the following):
[ ] Checked the list created by the
Construction Contractors Board
under ORS 701.227 for bidders who
are not qualified to hold a public
improvement contract.
[ ] Determined whether the bidder has
met the standards of responsibility.
In so doing, the contracting agency
has found that the bidder
demonstrated that the bidder:
[ ] Has available the appropriate
financial, material, equipment,
facility and personnel resources
and expertise, or the ability to
obtain the resources and
expertise, necessary to meet
all contractual responsibilities.
[ ] Holds current licenses that
businesses or service professionals
operating in this state must hold
in order to undertake or perform
the work specified in the contract.
[ ] Is covered by liability insurance
and other insurance in amounts
required in the solicitation
documents.
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 3
[ ] Qualifies as a carrier-insured
employer or a self-insured
employer under ORS 656.407 or has
elected coverage under ORS 656.128.
[ ] Has disclosed the bidder’s first-
tier subcontractors in accordance
with ORS 279C.370.
[ ] Has a satisfactory record of
performance.
[ ] Has a satisfactory record of
integrity.
[ ] Is legally qualified to contract
with the contracting agency.
[ ] Possesses a certificate that
the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services issued under
ORS 279A.167.
[ ] Agrees to be bound by the terms
and conditions of a community
benefit contract if the public
contract is a community
benefit contract.
[ ] Has supplied all necessary
information in connection with
the inquiry concerning
responsibility.
[ ] Determined the bidder to be
(check one of the following): 
[ ] Responsible under ORS 279C.375
(3)(a) and (b).
[ ] Not responsible under
ORS 279C.375 (3)(a) and (b).
(Attach documentation if the contracting agency finds the bidder not to be responsible.)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(d) Submit the form described in paragraph (c) of this  subsection, with any attachments, to the
Construction Contractors Board within 30 days after  the date the contracting agency awards the
contract.
(4) The successful bidder shall:
(a) Promptly execute a formal contract; and
(b) Execute and deliver  to the contracting agency a performance bond and a payment bond when
required under ORS 279C.380.
(5) Based on competitive bids, a contracting agency may award a public improvement  contract
or may award multiple public improvement contracts when specified in the invitation to bid.
(6) A contracting agency may not exclude a commercial contractor from competing  for a public
contract on the basis that the license issued by the Construction Contractors Board  is endorsed as
a level 1 or level 2 license. As used  in this section, “commercial contractor” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 701.005.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 279C.430 is amended to read:
279C.430. (1) A contracting agency  or, if appropriate,  a local contract review board,  may
adopt a rule, resolution, ordinance or other regulation [ requiring mandatory prequalification  for all
persons desiring to bid for public improvement contracts that  are to be let by the agency ] that permits
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 4
or requires a prospective bidder or proposer to prequalify for public  improvement contracts,
including community benefit contracts, for which the contracting agency intends  to conduct
a procurement. The rule, resolution, ordinance or  other regulation authorized by this section must
include the time for submitting prequalification applications and a general description of the  type
and nature of the contracts [ that may be let ] for which the contracting agency intends to con-
duct a procurement . The prequalification application must  be in writing on a standard form pre-
scribed under the authority of ORS 279A.050.
(2) [ When] If  a contracting agency  or local contract review board  permits  or requires pre-
qualification of bidders, a person who wishes to prequalify shall  submit a prequalification applica-
tion to the contracting agency  on a standard form prescribed under subsection (1) of this section.
Within 30 days after [ receipt of ] receiving  a prequalification application, the contracting agency
shall investigate  the applicant as necessary to determine if the applicant is qualified. The determi-
nation [ shall] must  be made in less than 30 days, if practicable, if the applicant requests an early
decision to allow the applicant as much  time as possible to prepare a bid on a contract that [ has
been] the contracting agency  advertised. In making [ its] the determination, the contracting  agency
shall consider only the  applicable standards of responsibility listed in ORS 279C.375 (3)(b). The
agency shall promptly notify the applicant whether or not the applicant is qualified.
(3) If the contracting agency finds that  the applicant is qualified, the notice must state the na-
ture and type of contracts [ that the  person is qualified to bid on ] for which the prospective con-
tractor may submit a bid or  proposal and the period of time for which the qualification is valid
under the contracting agency’s rule, resolution,  ordinance or other regulation. If the contracting
agency finds the applicant is not qualified as  to any contracts covered by the rule, resolution, or-
dinance or other regulation, the notice must specify the reasons found  under ORS 279C.375 (3)(b) for
not prequalifying the applicant  and inform the applicant of the right to a hearing under ORS
279C.445 and 279C.450.
(4) If a contracting  agency has reasonable cause to believe that [ there has been ] a substantial
change has taken place  in the conditions of a prequalified person and that  because of  the sub-
stantial change the person is no longer qualified or  is less qualified, the agency may revoke or may
revise and reissue the prequalification after reasonable notice to the prequalified person.  The notice
shall state the reasons found under ORS 279C.375 (3)(b) for revocation  or revision of the prequali-
fication of the person and inform the person of the right to a hearing under ORS  279C.445 and
279C.450. A revocation or revision does not apply to any public improvement contract  for which
publication of an advertisement, in accordance with ORS 279C.360, commenced before  the date the
notice of revocation or revision was received by the prequalified person.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 279C.375 and  279C.430
by sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act apply to procurements that a contracting agency or  local
contract review board advertises or otherwise solicits, or if the contracting agency or local
contract review board does not solicit the procurement, to public contracts into which  the
contracting agency or local  contract review board enters on or after the operative date
specified in section 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) Section 2 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to  ORS 279C.375 and
279C.430 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) A contracting agency or local contract review board  may enact or adopt, as appro-
priate, an  ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation or other legislative or administrative
measure before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary
to enable the contracting agency or local contract review board, on and after the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to undertake or exercise  all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the contracting agency or local contract review board  by
section 2 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 279C.375 and 279C.430 by sections  3
and 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 5
Passed by Senate April 29, 2021
Repassed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 420 (SB 420-B) Page 6